District of Columbia statutes.
38-1202.04

Reimbursement of Trustees.

Trustees shall serve without compensation except that each Trustee shall be entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred while actually engaged in service as a Trustee, provided that these expenses are properly documented. In no case, however, shall a Trustee receive expense reimbursement that exceeds $4,000 per annum.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1426, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 204
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 4, 22 DCR 2292
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3204(f), 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(gg), 27 DCR 2632
Apr. 20, 1991, D.C. Law 8-259, § 2, 38 DCR 1449
July 13, 1991, D.C. Law 9-13, § 2, 38 DCR 3378
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 31-1514.
1973 Ed., § 31-1714.